en: Gift Giving
xx: Gift Giving
cs: Dárky
da: Gavegivning
de: Schenken
es: Regalos
fr: Cadeaux
it: Regali
ja: ギフト
nl: Cadeaus
no: Gaver
pl: Wręczanie prezentów
pt: Dar presentes
ru: Подарки
sv: Presenter
tr: Hediyelik Eşyalar

en: Corsage & Boutonnière Pins
xx: Corsage & Boutonnière Pins
cs: Špendlíky pro korsáže do klopy a na zápěstí
da: Corsage- og knaphulsblomster
de: Befestigungsnadeln für Anstecksträußchen
es: Pasadores para corpiños y ojales
fr: Broches pour petits bouquets et boutonnières
it: Spilloni ornamentali per corpetto
ja: コサージュ・ブートニア用ピン
nl: Corsage- en boutonnièrespelden
no: Brystbuketter og knappehullsnåler
pl: Szpilki na przypinki kwiatowe i dodatki do butonierek
pt: Alfinetes para flores de pulso e de lapela
ru: Булавки для цветков и бутоньерок
sv: Nålar för knapphålsblommor och corsage
tr: Çiçek ve Yaka Çiçeği İğneleri

en: Corsages & Boutonnières
xx: Corsages & Boutonnières
cs: Korsáže do klopy a na zápěstí
da: Corsage- og knaphuller
de: Anstecksträußchen
es: Agujas para ojal y corpiños
fr: Petits bouquets et boutonnières
it: Mazzolini di fiori e fiori all'occhiello per abito
ja: コサージュ・ブートニア
nl: Corsages en boutonnières
no: Brystbuketter og knappehullsornamenter
pl: Przypinki kwiatowe i dodatki do butonierek
pt: Flores de pulso e de lapela
ru: Цветки для петлиц и бутоньерки
sv: Knapphålsblommor och corsage
tr: Çiçekler ve Yaka Çiçekleri

en: Fresh Cut Flowers
xx: Fresh Cut Flowers
cs: Řezané květiny
da: Nyplukkede blomster
de: Frische Schnittblumen
es: Flores recién cortadas
fr: Fleurs coupées fraîches
it: Fiori freschi recisi
ja: 生花・花束
nl: Verse snijbloemen
no: Blomsterbuketter
pl: Kwiaty cięte
pt: Flores recém-cortadas
ru: Свежие цветы
sv: Snittblommor
tr: Taze Çiçekler

en: Gift Cards & Certificates
xx: Gift Cards & Certificates
cs: Dárkové certifikáty
da: Gavekort og tilgodebeviser
de: Geschenkgutscheine
es: Cheques regalo
fr: Cartes et chèques cadeaux
it: Buoni regalo
ja: 商品券・ギフト券
nl: Cadeaubonnen
no: Gavekort og kuponger
pl: Bony podarunkowe
pt: Vale-presentes
ru: Подарочные сертификаты
sv: Presentkort och kuponger
tr: Hediye kartları

en: Gift Wrapping
xx: Gift Wrapping
cs: Dárkové balení
da: Gaveindpakning
de: Geschenkverpackungen
es: Envoltorios para regalos
fr: Emballage de cadeaux
it: Confezioni regalo
ja: ラッピング用品
nl: Geschenkverpakkingen
no: Gavepapir
pl: Pakowanie prezentów
pt: Embrulhar presentes
ru: Упаковка подарков
sv: Presentinslagning
tr: Hediye Ambalajları

en: Gift Bags
xx: Gift Bags
cs: Dárkové tašky
da: Gaveposer
de: Geschenktaschen
es: Bolsas de regalo
fr: Sacs pour cadeaux
it: Sacchetti regalo
ja: ギフトバッグ
nl: Cadeautasjes
no: Gaveposer
pl: Torby na prezenty
pt: Sacolas de presente
ru: Подарочные сумки
sv: Presentpåsar
tr: Hediye Poşetleri

en: Gift Boxes & Tins
xx: Gift Boxes & Tins
cs: Dárkové krabice a plechovky
da: Gaveæsker
de: Geschenkboxen & -dosen
es: Cajas de regalo
fr: Boîtes à cadeaux
it: Confezioni regalo e scatole di latta
ja: ギフトボックス
nl: Geschenkdoosjes en -blikjes
no: Gaveesker og -bokser
pl: Pudełka i puszki na prezenty
pt: Latas e caixas para presente
ru: Коробки для подарков
sv: Presentlådor och burkar
tr: Hediye Kutu ve Metal Kutuları

en: Gift Tags & Labels
xx: Gift Tags & Labels
cs: Dárkové visačky a štítky
da: Gavemærker
de: Geschenkanhänger
es: Etiquetas para regalos
fr: Étiquettes cadeaux
it: Etichette e biglietti per regali
ja: ギフトタグ・ギフトラベル
nl: Geschenkkaartjes en -labels
no: Gaveetiketter og til/fra-lapper
pl: Bileciki i etykiety do prezentów
pt: Etiquetas para presentes
ru: Ярлыки и наклейки для подарков
sv: Presentetiketter
tr: Hediye Kartları ve Etiketleri

en: Tissue Paper
xx: Tissue Paper
cs: Hedvábný papír
da: Silkepapir
de: Seidenpapier
es: Papel de seda
fr: Papier de soie
it: Carta velina
ja: ラッピング用ティッシュペーパー
nl: Vloeipapier
no: Silkepapir
pl: Bibuły
pt: Papel de seda
ru: Шёлковая бумага
sv: Mjukpapper
tr: İnce Kağıtlar

en: Wrapping Paper
xx: Wrapping Paper
cs: Balicí papír
da: Indpakningspapir
de: Geschenkpapier
es: Papel de regalo
fr: Papier cadeau
it: Carta da regalo
ja: ラッピングペーパー
nl: Inpakpapier
no: Innpakningspapir
pl: Papiery do pakowania
pt: Papel de presente
ru: Обёрточная бумага
sv: Inslagspapper
tr: Ambalaj Kağıtları

en: Greeting & Note Cards
xx: Greeting & Note Cards
cs: Blahopřání
da: Lykønskningskort
de: Grußkarten
es: Tarjetas de felicitación y papel de carta
fr: Cartes de vœux et de correspondance
it: Biglietti di auguri e note
ja: グリーティングカード
nl: Wenskaarten en notitiekaarten
no: Gratulasjonskort og notatkort
pl: Kartki okolicznościowe
pt: Cartões festivos e de mensagens
ru: Поздравительные открытки
sv: Korrespondenskort
tr: Tebrik ve Not Kartları

en: Party Supplies
xx: Party Supplies
cs: Potřeby pro párty
da: Festartikler
de: Partyzubehör
es: Productos para fiestas
fr: Articles de fête
it: Articoli per la festa
ja: パーティーグッズ
nl: Feestartikelen
no: Festutstyr
pl: Artykuły na przyjęcia
pt: Artigos para festas
ru: Товары для вечеринок
sv: Festtillbehör
tr: Parti Malzemeleri

en: Advice Cards
xx: Advice Cards
cs: Přáníčka
da: Kort til gode råd
de: Spruchkarten
es: Tarjetas de consejos
fr: Cartes de conseils
it: Biglietti per consigli
ja: アドバイスカード
nl: Wens- en advieskaartjes
no: Kort med lykkeønskninger
pl: Kartki okolicznościowe z sentencją
pt: Cartões de conselhos
ru: Открытки для советов
sv: Rådgivningskort
tr: Tavsiye Kartları

en: Balloon Kits
xx: Balloon Kits
cs: Sady pro nafukování balónků
da: Ballonsæt
de: Ballon-Sets
es: Kits de globos
fr: Kits de ballons
it: Kit di palloncini
ja: 風船・バルーンセット
nl: Ballonnensets
no: Ballongsett
pl: Zestawy balonów
pt: Kits de balões
ru: Наборы воздушных шариков
sv: Ballongkit
tr: Balon Setleri

en: Balloons
xx: Balloons
cs: Balónky
da: Balloner
de: Luftballons
es: Globos
fr: Ballons
it: Palloncini
ja: 風船・バルーン
nl: Ballonnen
no: Ballonger
pl: Balony
pt: Bexigas
ru: Воздушные шарики
sv: Ballonger
tr: Balonlar

en: Banners
xx: Banners
cs: Plakáty
da: Bannere
de: Banner
es: Pancartas
fr: Banderoles
it: Striscioni
ja: パーティーバナー
nl: Spandoeken
no: Bannere
pl: Banery
pt: Banners
ru: Праздничные транспаранты
sv: Banderoller
tr: Pankartlar

en: Birthday Candles
xx: Birthday Candles
cs: Dortové svíčky
da: Fødselsdagslys
de: Geburtstagskerzen
es: Velas de cumpleaños
fr: Bougies d'anniversaire
it: Candeline
ja: バースデーキャンドル
nl: Verjaardagskaarsen
no: Fødselsdagslys
pl: Świeczki urodzinowe
pt: Velas de aniversário
ru: Свечи для тортов
sv: Tårtljus
tr: Doğum Günü Mumları

en: Chair Sashes
xx: Chair Sashes
cs: Slavnostní potahy na židle
da: Stoledekorationer
de: Stuhlbezüge
es: Lazos para sillas
fr: Décorations de chaises
it: Addobbi per sedie
ja: チェアサッシュ
nl: Stoelstrikken
no: Dekorative stolbånd
pl: Dekoracje krzeseł
pt: Capas para cadeiras
ru: Накидки на стулья
sv: Stolsdekorationer
tr: Sandalye Kuşakları

en: Cocktail Decorations
xx: Cocktail Decorations
cs: Koktejlové dekorace
da: Cocktaildekorationer
de: Cocktaildekorationen
es: Decoraciones para cócteles
fr: Décorations pour cocktails
it: Decorazioni per cocktail
ja: カクテルデコレーション
nl: Cocktailversieringen
no: Cocktaildekorasjoner
pl: Dekoracje koktajlowe
pt: Decorações de coquetéis
ru: Украшения для коктейлей
sv: Drinkdekorationer
tr: Kokteyl Süsleri